<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88708-0021 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-08-88.f2.A1020</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 131 / Friday, July 8, 1988 / ProposedRules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Urban Mass Transportation Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">49 CFR Part 653</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[UMTA Docket No. 88-F]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Control of Drug Use In Mass Transportation Operations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Urban Mass Transportation Administration (UMTA), DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>UMTA is requesting comment on a proposed rule which wouldrequire a recipient of Federal transit funding to certify that it has establisheda comprehensive anti-drug program. The impetus for this action is the safetyconcern associated with the use of drugs by mass transportation workersin sensitive safety positions. The overall goal of testing is to ensurea drug-free transportation environment which, in turn, would reduce accidentsand casualties in mass transit operations. Among other things, a recipient'santi-drug program would be required to mandate chemical testing for theuse of drugs by those in certain sensitive safety positions. In addition,the NPRM sets out four options concerning rehabilitation for certain employees.Finally, a recipient's program would be required to include an employeeassistance program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Written comments should be received by September 6, 1988.Public hearings will be held in the following cities: Washington, DC, NewYork, Chicago, and Los Angeles. The dates and locations of the hearingswill be published in a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> soon.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Written comments should be addressed to: U.S. Departmentof Transportation, Urban Mass Transportation Administration, Office ofthe Chief Counsel, Docket No. 88-F, 400 7th Street SW., Room 9316, Washington,DC 20590. Comments will be available for review by the public at this addressfrom 9:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m., Monday through Friday. The dates and locationsof the public hearings will be published soon in a Notice in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Franz K. Gimmler, Deputy AssociateAdministrator for Safety, or Judy Z. Meade, Drug and Alcohol Program Manager,Urban Mass Transportation Administration, Department of Transportation,400 Seventh Street SW., Washington, DC 20590, (202) 366-2896.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">A. Background</ITAG>Drug Abuse in American SocietyDrug abuse constitutes a major societal problem. Statistics have been compiledand reported by the National Institute of Drug Abuse (NIDA) and by mediapolls. The results indicate that the use of drugs is widespread. Comparedwith 1979 and 1982 levels, the 18-25 year old group was most likely tohave stabilized or decreased their use of most drugs in 1985. In contrast,the 26 plus year old group was most likely to have increased their useof most drugs. For instance, preliminary data from the 1985 NIDA, ``NationalSurvey on Drug Abuse,'' indicate the following:In the 18-25 age category:<ITAG tagnum="15">_60.5 percent reported using marijuana sometime during their life;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_21.9 percent reported using marijuana within the past month;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_25.2 percent reported using cocaine sometime during their life;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_7.7 percent reported using cocaine within the past month.</ITAG>In the age 26 and over category:<ITAG tagnum="15">_27 percent reported using marijuana sometime during their life;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_9.5 percent reported using marijuana within the past month;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_9.5 percent reported using cocaine sometime during their life;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_2.1 percent reported using cocaine within the past month.</ITAG>Because of statistics like the above, the public is concerned that an individualwho uses drugs may jeopardize the personal safety of others. A recentlyissued special report from the Comptroller General of the United Statestitled ``Controlling Drug Abuse: A Status Report'' (1988 GAO Report) statesthat ``Drug abuse in the United States has persisted at a very high levelthroughout the 1980's. Drug abuse is a serious national problem that adverselyaffects all parts of our society * * *.''There is widespread public belief that persons in safety-affecting occupationsshould not be abusers of drugs. POPULUS, Inc., and Decision/Making/Informationconducted a national survey in 1986 on mandatory drug testing in the workplace. The following are the results of that survey concerning the generalpublic's views on drug testing of individuals in various occupations. Ofthose surveyed:<ITAG tagnum="15">_88% favored testing of airline pilots and air traffic controllers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_85% favored testing of police and other law enforcement agents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_81% favored testing of bus drivers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_75% favored testing of military personnel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_75% favored testing employees of pharmaceutical companies.</ITAG>The researchers concluded that the respondents believed ``people who areresponsible for the physical safety of others should be tested.'' Transportationworkers affect public safety and the public supports testing these workersfor the use of drugs. POPULUS, Inc., and Decision/Making/Information, ``MandatoryDrug Testing: A Nation Divided * * * Or Is It?'' Final Report, Greenwich,CT (July 1986).Another 1986 survey examined the public's attitude toward drug testingof certain occupational groups. American Viewpoint, Inc., conducted a nationaltelephone survey of 1,000 respondents. The results indicate, ``by a marginof 76 percent to 22 percent, Americans agree that the drug crisis todayis serious enough for mandatory drug testing.'' American Viewpoint, Inc.,used a ``forced choice'' list that did not include the transportation modeswhen doing the survey. The persons surveyed placed the following occupationsat the top of their list for mandatory drug testing:<ITAG tagnum="15">_Police and firefighters (84%)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Members of the armed forces (83%)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Doctors and nurses (81%)</ITAG>Eighty percent of the respondents indicated they would participate in voluntarytesting if asked to do so by their employers. American Viewpoint, Inc.,``U.S. National Survey,'' Alexandria, VA (August 1986).Based on the above information, UMTA concludes that the public is concernedabout drug abuse and supports drug testing of workers affecting publicsafety. Although drug abuse is more prevalent among the 25 and under agegroup, younger users are aging, and not stopping. The Department of Transportationin its regulatory role of protecting public safety, assumes that the problemof drug abuse among transportation workers does not differ significantlyfrom that in the overall population.Effects of Drug Use on SafetyThis NPRM proposes to prohibit certain mass transportation workers in sensitive-safetypositions from making non-approved uses of controlled substances, whetheron duty or off duty. The premise of this proposal is very simple: Use ofany controlled substance has the potential to degrade safety performance.In order to understand this premise, it is necessary to review what controlledsubstances are and what effects they have on individual persons.Drugs are chemicals that affect the body (physiological or function-alteringeffects) and often the mind (psychological or mind-altering effects). Inbroad summary, controlled substances are certain drugs identified by thegovernment as having mind- or function-altering effects of a kind thatcreate a potential for abuse and/or dependency. In comments before theDepartment of Transportation, the American Medical Association and otherparties have agreed that, as a general matter, controlled substances constitutethe primary drugs of interest (other than alcohol) with respect to transportationsafety.The Controlled Substances Act (26 U.S.C. 801 <T3>et seq.</T3>), among other things, establishes five schedules of controlledsubstances. Most controlled substances have at least some accepted medicalapplications, but those classified in Schedule I of the controlled substanceslist do not. Therapeutic use of certain controlled substances is frequentlyindicated both from a medical point of view and from the point of viewof transportation safety, since proper use of drugs can control disordersthat adversely affect performance while permitting the individual to continueproductive employment. If therapeutic drugs are used at appropriate levelsestablished by medical practitioners and care is taken to monitor undesired``side effects,'' safety will not be materially compromised. Indeed, inmany cases, control of the underlying disorder will produce net safetybenefits.However, when individuals make non-medical use of controlled substances,they often use illegal drugs that have unacceptable mind-altering and function-alteringcharacteristics. Similarly, when individuals self-administer legal drugsfor non-medical purposes, or without proper medical supervision, adverseeffects may result.Drugs and Their EffectsControlled substances are classified as_andbullet; Narcotics, such as the opiate-based drugs;andbullet; Central nervous system (CNS) depressants, such as the barbiturates,tranquilizers, or methaqualone;andbullet; CNS stimulants, such as cocaine and amphetamines;andbullet; Hallucinogens, such as LSD and PCP; andandbullet; Cannabis (marijuana derivatives).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">All controlled substances have a potential for abuse, and many havea high potential for dependence. The effects of these drugs vary to someextent by dosage, subject, frequency of use, route of ingestion, and patternof use. An individual drug user may be affected differently by the samedosage on different occasions as a result of degree of fatigue, physicaldisorders, biorhythms, acquired tolerance, and other factors.It is important to note that the effects of drugs on human performanceare not limited to a perceived ``high'' or other immediate mind-alteringsensation experienced by the user. Instead, drug effects are complex and,in many cases, long-lived. The potential effects of drugs include_andbullet; <T3>Acute effects, </T3>immediate physiological or psychological changesincluding the often sought-after change of mental state; andbullet; <T3>After effects, </T3>delayed or prolonged physiological or psychologicalchanges from individual doses or series of doses; andbullet; <T3>Chronic effects, </T3>physiological or psychological changes, includingchanges in cognitive functions and biochemistry resulting from prolongeduse; and andbullet; <T3>Withdrawal effects, </T3>physiological or psychological changes resultingfrom termination of use. All of these potential effects are of concern with respect to transportationsafety. Yet only the acute effects correlate to some extent with bloodconcentrations of the impairing substance. For most drugs the extent ofthat correlation is unknown. Perceived Dangers of Drugs in Transportation The potential detrimental effects of drugs on performance are not a matterof speculation. There is a broad consensus among transportation companies,employees and related professionals that the use of alcohol and the non-medicaluse of controlled substances are not consistent with safety. Increasingly,knowledgeable safety professionals in transportation are beginning to realizethat ``off-duty use'' and ``on-duty use'' are not completely distinct categorieswarranting entirely separate consideration. Instead, such uses are facetsof an overall picture_<T3>i.e., </T3>overall fitness for duty involving ``sensitive-safety''functions. Although there are differences of opinion among transportationsafety experts concerning appropriate countermeasures, the need for effectivecountermeasures is almost universally acknowledged. Experimental/Clinical Data Developing opinion in the transportation industries is informed by a growingbody of information related to drug effects on safety. Numerous behavioralstudies and extensive clinical experience have established the fact thatcontrolled substances can powerfully alter the capacity of human beingsto respond to their environment. The following discussion will explain how drugs can and do adversely affectsafety. Since each human being is, from a scientific view, a unique andwhole organism, any such discussion will suffer from incompleteness andan absence of total analytical integration. However, available literaturedoes offer useful information that can be placed in appropriate contextand can guide the formulation of public policy. Among other sources, thisdiscussion draws heavily on a draft study prepared by the TransportationSystems Center of the Department of Transportation. A copy of that report(Sussman, Salvatore, Huntley and Hobbs, ``Data Available on the Impactof Drug Use on Transportation Safety,'' April 17, 1978) will be placedin the docket of this rulemaking. Drug effects can be analyzed in experimental studies from the point ofview of their impact on particular human faculties. These faculties are,of course, merely aspects of human performance capabilities, and experimentalstudies often involve tasks that may call on more than one faculty. ``Sensoryfunction'' refers to the ability of an individual to detect, feel, identify,discriminate between, and recognize objects and conditions. Visual acuityand perception are of greatest concern for transportation employees. ``Motorperformance'' concerns that ability to make timely, accurate, and steadycontrol movements. Both simple and complex reaction time, as well as trackingand steadiness, are skills of concern to transportation. ``Vigilance''is a term used to describe the ability of an individual to detect and respondto extremely infrequent signals provided as a part of a low event or boringtask. Maintaining attention and alertness is important for all transportationoperators, particularly during night operations. ``Cognitive functions''refers to the ability to classify, store, integrate and recall information.Judgment, memory, proclivity for risk-taking, and ability to manage multipletasks are areas of particular concern for transportation. The clear message from available evidence is that all controlled substancestend to affect adversely one or more of the faculties critical to safeconduct of transportation and transportation-related studies. In some cases,acute effects may be of greatest concern. With other drugs the primaryhazards may relate to after effects and chronic effects. Some individualsmay be unimpaired by some drugs at some dosages with respect to certainfaculties relevant to performance. Indeed, in certain discrete settingsCNS stimulants may temporarily enhance the ability of an individual tosustain attention (as an acute effect). However, when the full range ofeffects is considered, no controlled substance can be eliminated as a sourceof significant concern. <T3>Narcotics </T3>are among the drugs having the highest potential forabuse and dependence, and use of narcotics is therefore unlikely to belimited to off-duty hours. Narcotics dull the perception of external andinternal stimuli and tend to induce a feeling of pleasant lethargy. Thesedrugs can adversely affect motor performance, as well as vigilance. Althoughthere is no extensive body of literature on the effects of narcotics ontasks common to transportation, standard therapeutic practice requireswarning that narcotics should not be used by transportation or heavy-equipmentoperators except where side effects have been determined and then onlyunder strict medical supervision. <T3>CNS depressants </T3>include a variety of compounds that reduce sensitivityto stimuli, slow information processing, and impair the ability of theuser to concentrate or focus attention. Behavioral studies of the acute effects of CNS depressants have demonstrateddecrements to monitor performance, including tracking skills, simple reactiontime, and choice reaction time. Depressants may adversely affect sensoryfunctions such as signal recognition and cognitive functions such as short-termmemory and information processing. Experimental evidence also shows that after effects of depressant use (hangovers)can impair performance. Further, most CNS depressants have a high-dependencypotential, and severe withdrawal effects can result if use is discontinuedsuddenly. Since the timing of withdrawal symptoms is not always predictable,the cessation of use by a depressant-dependent person can result in lossof control over a transportation vehicle or task. Instances of severe withdrawalfrom alcohol, involving convulsions and loss of control, have been reportedin the aviation context. Moreover, withdrawal from other CNS depressantspresent risks of equal gravity.<T3>CNS stimulants </T3>such as cocaine and amphetamines tend to increasemental activity, responsiveness to external stimuli, and in some casesrestore concentration to fatigued individuals. These apparently benignqualities make stimulants (particularly amphetamine) attractive ``operational''drugs (taken in an effort to sustain or enhance performance), as well asso-called ``recreational drugs''. The non-regulated stimulant caffeineis taken for similar purposes.However, powerful stimulants do not avoid fatigue, but only postpone itand thereby compound its severity. Side effects may include restlessness,increased anxiety, and confusion. Transportation employees may rely uponthe drug for periods which go beyond its period of effectiveness, resultingin the sudden onset of deep sleep. Sustained reliance on amphetamines mayresult in toxic effects such as paranoia and delirium, since increasingdoses are needed to offset developing tolerance. While it is widely heldthat stimulants do not produce true physical dependence, it is also recognizedthat they can induce a strong psychological dependence.Recent experience with cocaine has confirmed the dependency-producing characterof that drug, its potent psychoactivity, its ability to induce seizuresand cardiovascular events after a single dose, and its ability to producepsychosis after chronic use. <T3>See e.g., Cocaine: Pharmacology, Effects, and Treatment of Abuse, </T3>ResearchMonograph Series, No. 50 (National Institute on Drug Abuse 1984). Reportsof drug experiences strongly suggest that cocaine use may promote risk-takingand cause the user to over estimate his degree of control. Cocaine is notan attractive ``operational'' drug because of its short duration, but useby an employee prior to reporting for work may result in depression orexacerbate fatigue, leaving the employee poorly equipped to undertake afull work day. Because dependency on cocaine may manifest itself abruptlyafter a long period of apparently successful ``occasional'' use, the cocaineabuser's private ``recreation'' may become a matter of public safety concernat any time without warning.Although no experimental studies reflecting the effects of stimulants overan extended period of time have been reported, clinical experience suggeststhat these substances have a significant potential for producing behavioralchanges inimical to safety, particularly when used in high concentrationsor over a long period of time.<T3>Hallucinogens </T3>are ingested for the specific purpose of inducingeuphoria and a distortion of time and space. These drugs generally producerelaxation and shortened attention span. Hallucinogens have not been thesubject of responsible scientific research involving human subjects becauseof their capacity to produce psychotic reactions. Use of hallucinogensis of particular concern, since they may trigger mental disturbances thatcan last for extended periods or recur without warning.<T3>Marijuana </T3>is sometimes classified as an hallucinogen but has propertiesthat warrant its separate treatment. As the most popular illegal drug ofabuse, marijuana was once viewed by many Americans as a mild and relativelyharmless substance. However, as the potency of marijuana available increasedand a larger segment of the population gained experience in its use, itbecame apparent that marijuana had emerged as a major public health andsafety risk.By 1980, it could be said that marijuana impairs learning ability and interfereswith complex psychomotor performance, including driving. <T3>Marijuana Research Findings: 1980, </T3>Research Monograph Series No.31 (National Institute on Drug Abuse). In addition, marijuana became morewidely recognized as a threat to health. Institute of Medicine, NationalAcademy of Sciences, <T3>Marijuana and Health </T3>(National Academy Press 1982).According to the experimental studies, marijuana affects such sensory functionsas visual acuity, signal detection, and balance or standing steadiness.Closed-course and city driving tests both indicated reduced driving precision,some of which the Institute on Medicine (<T3>Id. </T3>at 118) assessed as indicating impairment of judgment as wellas car-handling skills.Laboratory studies have also demonstrated reduced vigilance in signal-detectiontasks. Studies evaluating cognitive functions indicated that marijuanamay reduce risk taking, but also show that marijuana reduces performancein divided-attention situations.Recent research has suggested the possibility of next-day after effectsfrom marijuana that may reduce performance on complex, divided-attentiontasks. Yesavage, Leirer, Denari and Hollister, ``Carry-Over Effects ofMarijuana Intoxication on Aircraft Pilot Performance: A Preliminary Report''(<T3>Am. J. Psychiatry </T3>142:1325-1329 (1985)). Some experts also believethat the accumulation of marijuana metabolites in the body through chronicuse may produce adverse effects that do not abate at any time while themarijuana habit is sustained. Since marijuana metabolites have been identifiedat low levels in the urine for as long as 77 days after cessation of heavyand chronic use, the possibility of significant chronic effects cannotbe excluded. <T3>See </T3>Ellis, Mann, Judson, Schramm and Tashchian, ``Excretion Patternsof Cannabinoid Metabolites After Last Use in a Group of Chronic Users''(<T3>Clin. Pharmacol. Ther. </T3>38:572-578 (1985)).<T3>In summary, </T3>drugs in each of the classes of controlled substanceshave mind and function-altering effects on the human subject. Recent researchinvolving several widely-used drugs vividly illustrates the correlationamong clinical data, theoretical pharmacology, and performance on transportation-relatedtasks. Smiley, Moskowitz, and Ziedman, ``Effects of Drugs on Driving'',DHHS Publication No. (ADM) 85-1386 (National Institute on Drug Abuse andNational Highway Traffic Safety Administration 1985). Smiley, <T3>et al., </T3>examined the effects of secobarbital and diazepam (CNSdepressants), marijuana and alcohol in a complex, blind study using a drivingsimulator. The study measured performance on a variety of driving tasks,including stop or swerve decisions, tracking, passing, and maintainingdistance at two dosage levels for each drug. The results revealed differencesin particular effects and performances on individual phases of the study.However, when the data were combined the authors concluded as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Secobarbital, diazepam, marijuana, and alcohol were all found to impairperformance of a variety of simulated driving tasks. Drug levels testedfor secobarbital and diazepam were therapeutic doses. The marijuana doseswere considered moderate to strong by the subject population use. The alcoholeffects were reported for levels up to and slightly above the legal limit.<T3>No clear-cut differences in the pattern of effects were found amongthe drugs tested. </T3>All drugs impaired perceptual-motor skill (<T3>e.g., </T3>tracking, speed and headway control), perceptual tasks whereresponse time and detection ability were measured, and decision-makingtasks. <T3>Id. </T3>19 (emphasis supplied).</ITAG>This research suggests that the subtle differences in the way that certaindrugs affect human functions may be less important than the overall disorderingeffect of those drugs on the user's ability to respond to the complex challengesposed by the transportation environment.Finally, as noted above, many of the detrimental effects of drugs relatenot so much to the toxic or acute action of the drug when it may be foundin high concentrations in the blood stream, but rather to the chronic orcumulative action of the drug on the body and the mind. Much of this long-termimpairment of the organism is poorly understood but what is known is asource of concern.Epidemiological StudiesAn approach to evaluating the effects of drugs on transportation safetywould include a program to determine the presence of drug use in an adequatesample of accidents and the collection of data on the incidence of druguse among all drivers. With this information, it would be possible to determinewhether the user was overrepresented in the accident population. Over aperiod of years, analysis of this kind has permitted the Department ofTransportation, through its National Highway Traffic Safety Administration,to determine the role of alcohol in highway accidents. Attempts to obtainpost-accident toxicology results are only now beginning to provide datathat may, in combination with careful field investigations, provide sufficientevidence to estimate accurately the involvement of drugs in transportationaccidents.A study of 440 fatally-injured, young California drivers detected alcoholin 70 percent of the drivers, marijuana in 37 percent, and cocaine in 11percent. Each of 24 other drugs was detected in fewer than 5 percent ofthe fatally-injured group. The authors concluded that only alcohol couldbe clearly ``associated with crash responsibility'' within the limitationsof the available data, and that the role of marijuana in automobile crasheswarrants further investigation. Williams, Peat, Crouch, Wells, and Finkle,``Drugs in Fatally Injured Young Male Drivers,'' <T3>Public Health Reports </T3>100:19-25 (1985).Another study examined the presence of alcohol and drugs among 497 driversinjured in motor vehicle accidents and treated in a Rochester, New Yorkhospital. Thirty-eight percent of the drivers had alcohol and/or anotherdrug in their systems. Alcohol was found in 25 percent of the drivers,marijuana in 9.5 percent of the drivers, and tranquilizers in 7.5 percentof the drivers. These results were considered conservative, because thedrivers were not required to provide blood samples and many refused. Terhuneand Fell, ``The Role of Alcohol, Marijuana, and Other Drugs in the Accidentsof Injured Drivers,'' NHTSA Technical Report DOT-HS-806-181 (Revised_March1982).As the foregoing studies indicate, in a number of instances, people mayhave used both drugs and alcohol. The multiple drug phenomenon suggeststhe hazard of relying on countermeasures directed exclusively at alcoholand complicates the evaluation of drug involvement. This dilemma is particularlycritical when it is considered that workers may use drugs other than alcoholon the job to avoid detection by their employer.The Problem of Drugs in the Mass Transit IndustryEmployees of the mass transit industry represent a broad and diverse crosssection of American society. It is reasonable to assume that the problemof drug and alcohol abuse exists in this industry in similar proportionto that existing in society as a whole. Personnel who use drugs and alcoholcan pose dangers to themselves and coworkers and can cause or exacerbateevents that may take human life, destroy property, and seriously harm theenvironment. The Department of Transportation (DOT) and the Urban MassTransportation Administration (UMTA) are committed to the goal of a drug-freetransportation system in all modes of transportation.UMTA does not contend that drug abuse among personnel engaged in mass transportationis present in any greater degree than in the general public or that accidentstatistics demonstrate drug abuse as a major factor in mass transit accidents.No data exist to prove the presence of a drug or alcohol abuse problemamong mass transit personnel. UMTA is very interested in receiving anyadditional data on the use of controlled substances by sensitive safetypersonnel in mass transit. However, UMTA believes that the public expects,and is entitled to expect, that transportation systems will be operatedsafely. The potential for accidents caused by mass transit personnel whoseskills may be impaired due to drug usage will be greatly decreased by theimplementation of a drug-testing program. Implementation of a drug abuseprevention program, including education and awareness, testing and rehabilitation,is necessary to ensure that mass transportation operates in the safestmanner possible.  <ITAG tagnum="84">B. The Statutory Basis for the Rule  </ITAG>The grant programs under both section 3 and section 9 of the Urban MassTransportation Act of 1964, as amended (The UMT Act) require a recipientof Federal financial assistance to have the inherent capacity to carryout the purposes of the transit grants. Under the section 3 discretionarygrants program, section 3(a)(2)(A)(i) provides that ``No grant or loanshall be provided under this section unless the Secretary determines thatthe applicant has or will have_(i) the legal, financial, and technicalcapacity to carry out the proposed project; * * *.''  Essentially the same requirement is contained in the formula grant programunder section 9, although in the form of a certification. Section 9(e)(3)provides that each recipient of section 9 funding ``* * * should submitto the Secretary annually a certification that such recipient * * * hasor will have the legal, financial, and technical capacity to carry outthe proposed program of projects * * *''. This provision also requiresa certification by the recipient that it has ``satisfactory continuingcontrol'' over the use of UMTA-assisted facilities and equipment.  The technical capacity to carry out a mass transit project necessarilymust include an ability to provide essentially <T3>safe </T3>mass transportation services, and it is within the scopeof this requirement for UMTA to require recipients of sections 3 and 9funding to undertake measures that would enhance their ability to providesafe operations. ``Satisfactory continuing control'' also necessarily impliesthe ability to ensure that the safe operation of UMTA-assisted facilitiesand equipment is not endangered by drug use by sensitive-safety and securitypersonnel.  Under the section 3 discretionary program, moreover, the Secretary is authorizedto make grants ``* * * on such terms and conditions as the Secretary mayprescribe * * *,'' providing even broader authority under this programto require a recipient to institute a drug program before a grant willbe awarded.  For the section 18 transportation program for non-urbanized areas, subsection18(f) provides that ``grants under this section shall be subject to suchterms and conditions (which are appropriate to the special needs of publictransportation in areas other than urbanized areas) as the Secretary mayprescribe.'' The requirements proposed here would be among the terms andconditions imposed under the authority of this section.  Section 22 of the UMT Act provides the Secretary (and, by delegation, UMTA)with authority to investigate certain conditions which the Secretary believescreates a serious hazard of death or injury. If the Secretary determinesthat such conditions do create such a hazard, the Secretary shall requirethe recipient of UMTA funding to submit a plan for correcting or eliminatingsuch condition. The Secretary is authorized to withhold funding under theUMT Act until the plan is implemented.  Finally, the Department is considering seeking legislation from Congressto clarify this existing authority.  <ITAG tagnum="84">C. Purpose of NPRM  </ITAG>It is the policy of UMTA that workers in sensitive-safety positions ofrecipients of Federal transit funds be free of drugs. To detect and deterthe use of drugs by such employees, this proposed rule would require recipientsto establish a program that would include four types of testing for theuse of controlled substances: (1) Pre-employment; (2) post-accident; (3)reasonable cause; (4) and random drug testing. The testing procedures wouldprotect individual privacy, ensure accountability and integrity of specimens,require confirmation of all positive screening tests, mandate the use oflaboratories operating within the guidelines to be established by the U.S.Department of Health and Human Services, provide confidentiality for testresults and medical histories, and ensure nondiscriminatory testing methodsand random drug testing.  Failure of a recipient to certify that it has established a drug programwill render it ineligible to receive Federal financial assistance undersection 3, 9, or 18 of the UMT Act.  <ITAG tagnum="84">D. The Proposed Rule  </ITAG>The overall goal of testing is to ensure a drug-free transportation environmentwhich, in turn, would reduce accidents and casualties in mass transit operations.This proposed rule would require recipients of Federal transit fundingto establish an effective, comprehensive anti-drug program within 180 daysof the effective date of the rule.  Under a comprehensive anti-drug program under this proposed rule, an employeein a sensitive safety position may not use controlled substances on oroff duty. (The terms controlled substances and drugs are synonymous inthis proposal.) If controlled substance use is detected, an individualshall not perform in a sensitive safety position. An individual may notbe hired or continue to work at a sensitive safety position if he or shehas a confirmed positive drug test as a result of a pre-employment, post-accident,reasonable cause, or random test.This NPRM proposes specific requirements for testing procedures and optionsfor rehabilitation programs. As noted later, UMTA realizes that some ofthese requirements may be difficult to achieve as proposed. This may beespecially true for small transit providers. UMTA is interested in commentson ways in which the objectives of this NPRM can be achieved through proceduresor programs without the need for detailed regulatory requirements. Forexample, should UMTA permit programs developed by consortiums of transitauthorities or employee organizations to be used to comply with the followingUMTA proposed program? We also seek comment on whether an industry-wideprogram, developed by industry and/or labor associations may be a viableand expedient mechanism to implement drug abatement programs. If so, UMTArequests detailed comments on how such program would be implemented.Drug testing and sanctions for use will help discourage substance abuseand reduce absenteeism, accidents, health care costs, and other drug-relatedproblems. It will act as a deterrent to those individuals who might betempted to try drugs for the first time or who currently use drugs. Finally,drug testing will protect the safety of the employees of mass transit entities,through the early identification and, under some options, rehabilitationof workers with drug abuse problems.This proposed rule would only affect employees in sensitive safety positions.UMTA specifically requests comment on whether security related positionsshould be subject to this proposed rule for the same reasons that sensitivesafety positions are.UMTA also requests comment on the practicality of recipients getting acomprehensive anti-drug program in place in the 180 day time period setout in the NPRM. UMTA recognizes that many recipients are State and localgovernments with their own policies and procedures as well as legislativeand regulatory bodies. Specifically, UMTA requests comment on alternativetime frames and reasons for them.Pre-employment TestingUMTA proposes to require recipients to ensure that employees in sensitivesafety positions are chemically tested for evidence of the use of controlledsubstances. A urine specimen would be used for testing purposes. An applicantwho tests positive for the use of a controlled substance or refused tobe tested could not be hired to perform sensitive-safety functions.A recipient would be responsible for ensuring that testing is carried outaccording to the requirements of the proposed rule, for receiving and maintainingdocumentation of the results for sensitive safety employees for 3 years,and for notifying applicants of the results and affording them an opportunityto explain the presence of a controlled substance. If the applicant isnot hired, no record of the test results will be maintained by the recipient.UMTA specifically requests comment on the proposed requirements that theemployer keep no records of an application for employment that has beenwithdrawn because of a failed drug test and on the proposed requirementthat the recipient not disclose the results of the test to any other person.We have made these proposals because we believe they are appropriate policiesfor the implementation of an effective and non-punitive anti-drug program.Comments are invited to the extent to which these proposals are necessaryor justified.Post-accident TestingPost-accident testing is a necessary part of a drug program. UMTA proposesmandatory testing for sensitive-safety employees involved in fatal accidents.The limitation to fatal accidents is purely a practical matter, and thisproposed regulation should not be interpreted to prohibit recipients fromtesting employees involved in other categories of accidents.A recipient would be responsible for ensuring that testing is done in theprescribed manner after a fatal accident. A fatal accident is defined asone in which a fatality occurs within 24 hours of the accident. Testingwould be done as soon as possible, but no later than 12 hours after thefatality. If testing is not done, the recipient would be required to furnishan explanation. In administering a drug test after an accident, UMTA proposesto authorize employers to test sensitive safety employees for any ScheduleI or Schedule II drug, even though many of these substances would not betested for in a pre-employment, random, or periodic test. This is the samepractice as would be followed by DOT in testing its employees under theproposed Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) guidelines.Post-accident testing would require the employee to go to a collectionsite and provide a urine sample within 12 hours of the fatality. A twelve-hourperiod was selected because UMTA believes this time frame will capturethose individuals who used prohibited drugs prior to the accident. Furthermore,this time frame takes into consideration the myriad of factors (geographicisolation of the accident, late notification of the accident to the recipient,injury, etc.) which could legitimately delay collection of a sample. UMTArequests comments on whether post-accident testing should be limited onlyto fatal accidents. For example, should it be expanded to include accidentsor incidents where hospitalization is required or include all accidents?Should positive post-accident tests be reported to UMTA and, if so, atwhat intervals?Reasonable Cause TestingUMTA proposes to require a recipient to conduct testing when it has reasonablecause that an on-duty sensitive-safety employee has used a controlled substance.Reasonable cause is based on a belief that an individual is using or isunder the influence of controlled substances while on duty. Changes incharacter or behavior may be evidence of the use of controlled substances.These changes are often characterized by mood swings and changes in appearance,attitude, speech, and work habits. In light of the subjectivity of thiscriteria, two witnesses would be required to substantiate this determination.At least one witness would have to be a person in a supervisory capacity.Are there practical problems to this approach? Should both of the observershave to be supervisors? What other criteria could be used that would protecta disfavored employee from potential harassment through drug testing? Shouldthere be a limit to the number of times an employee can be subjected toreasonable cause testing in order to prevent unwarranted harassment? Shouldthere be specified circumstances, such as rule violations, under whichdrug testing would be automatic? If so, what kind of rule violations wouldsuggest a drug problem and should trigger reasonable cause testing? Wenote in this regard that the Federal Railroad Administration has specified,in its existing anti-drug rule, the types of incidents that could justifyrequiring an employee to undergo drug testing. Could a similar programwork for recipients?Commenters also should present any data on the effectiveness of existingprograms which use reasonable cause- or suspicion-type testing. At leastone program that we are aware of provides for rehabilitation similar tothat proposed under option 3 below, but which was worked out by labor andmanagement. Sanctions, in terms of salary loss, are potentially quite severefor persons discovered to have drugs in their systems as a result of atest. Commenters should address the benefits, costs and deterrence valueof such a program.UMTA proposes to authorize employers to test sensitive-safety employeesfor any Schedule I or Schedule II drug when there is reasonable cause tobelieve a drug was used, even though many of the Schedule I and II substanceswould not be tested for in a pre-employment or random test. This is thesame practice as would be followed by DOT in testing its employees underthe proposed HHS guidelines.Random TestingRandom testing is expected to be the primary method of deterrence in theanti-drug program. Random testing avoids potential bias toward and selectiveharassment of an employee because every employee has an equal chance forselection at any time. Random selection is usually accomplished throughscientifically accepted methods such as the use of a random number tableor computer-based, random number generator. Both methods select individualsby matching these random numbers against an employee's social securitynumber or payroll account number.With random testing, abstinence is the only way to avoid the risk of detectionof drug use. Random drug testing requires a specific implementation planto deter drug use. The rule proposes to use a sampling rate of up to 125percent of employees performing specific sensitive safety functions. The125 percent sampling rate is based on the Coast Guard testing program.This does not mean that the rate would be set at 125 percent, but thisfigure serves as a benchmark on which comments about the most appropriaterate can be based. UMTA intends to select an appropriate rate based oneffectiveness deterrence, and costs. Commenters are asked to suggest whatthe rate should be and provide the basis for their views.A 125 percent rate for random testing would have certain advantages. Thistesting rate has been shown to be a viable deterrent in the Coast Guardprogram to future drug use and has been proven effective in reducing thepresent incidence of drug use. The Coast Guard's random testing programof its uniformed personnel resulted in reducing detected drug use by 75percent in the five years since the program was implemented. This testingrate currently is the best evidence available to UMTA regarding a successfulrandom testing program. UMTA is proposing 125 percent as a potential maximumtesting rate. At the same time, UMTA recognizes that the higher the samplingrate, the higher the costs of the program. UMTA invites comments on howlow a sampling percentage could be adopted while still maintaining a credibledeterrent. In particular, UMTA is interested in information on documented,effective random testing programs and the sampling rates that were usedas measured against the incidence of drug use on a year-to-year basis,and information that would provide updated estimates of the relative costsand effectiveness associated with various sampling rates. UMTA also requestscommenters to address whether the experience of uniformed personnel inthe Coast Guard program is a valid indicator of how sensitive safety masstransit employees would respond to a similar program.A sampling rate of 125 percent would mean that a population of 10,000 wouldprovide 12,500 annual samples. Similarly, a sampling rate of 12.5 percentwould provide 1,250 samples from the same population. Using true randomselection, employees selected for each weekly or monthly increment wouldbe returned to the pool of those eligible for testing and would be subjectto reselection. The vulnerability for reselection deters drug abuse becausean individual selected early in the testing cycle would still be equallysubject to testing throughout the remainder of the year and would stillrisk detection if he or she used drugs after the first test. One featureof this plan is that some employees might not be selected at all duringthe first year and others could be selected more than once. Another issuein this area is the matter of ``randomness'' among small or isolated populations.What, for example, is the meaning of a random test to an employee populationconsisting of only one employee, or a few employees? This problem is particularlyacute if the owner or manager of the business is also the sole person,or one of only a few persons, subject to testing. Similarly, although supriseis an essential feature of true random selection, how can this be achievedwhen the employee is located in a remote location and must be transportedsome distance to provide a sample? This could result in the loss of theelement of surprise in many cases. UMTA seeks comments on how to deal withthese problems.Should the rule permit transit providers, especially the small ones, touse a third party to set up and maintain their drug testing program? Theycould choose to comply with the rule through the use of several options,including:1. Form consortiums made of small providers that would develop a centrallyadministered random testing program.2. Form consortiums, and hire a contractor to develop and implement a randomtesting program.3. Contract separately with an outside company that would set-up and providethese services.4. Have existing industry-related groups (e.g. trade associations) set-updrug programs in which small entities could participate.5. Arrange to be included as a part of a larger grantee's drug testingprogram. UMTA invites comments as to what methods might be used to facilitate theinclusion of small entities in the program and whether all small entitiesshould be required to develop and implement a drug abatement program. Commenterswho believe that the proposed rule should not cover small entities, eitherin whole or in part, should explain the basis for their views and describehow they would define small entity for this purpose. UMTA is considering whether programs should provide for adjustment of theminimum sampling rate based upon the success of the program. Although anumerical target is needed as a benchmark for discussion, in actual practicethere may come a point of sharply diminishing returns from any set levelas the mix of countermeasures detects most chronic substance abuse anddeters casual use. The testing program could be designed so that it couldbe phased up or down as appropriate and in response to the pattern of resultsobtained through the program. In combination with post-accident testingexperiences, the results of random testing would provide the most usefulgauge of the need. UMTA is considering whether there are circumstancesunder which the program should allow for the level of effort to be increasedor scaled back based on a method of evaluation stated in the rule basedon individual applications and specifically requests comments on this issue.As with other issues, UMTA reserves the right to make appropriate adjustmentsin the rule in response to public comments. Are there any other ways toreduce costs or improve the effectiveness of the proposed rule? For example,are there any ways to grant employers flexibility without compromisingthe objectives of the rule? What would be the likely cost savings, if any,in a more flexible approach. UMTA also requests comments as to whether the rule should contain a provisionallowing a company with a high level of safety with regard to drug use,demonstrated over a designated time period, more latitude in determiningthe application of its anti-drug program. Applicability to Employees in Safety Sensitive Positions The NPRM would require a recipient of UMTA funding under section 3, 9,or 18 of the UMT Act, or 23 U.S.C. 103(e)(4), to certify that it had establisheda drug program that, at a minimum, provided for four types of drug testingand an employee assistance program. The NPRM would only require that thedrug program apply to sensitive safety positions, including vehicle operators,controllers, and mechanics. UMTA seeks particular comment on this definition.Does it adequately cover all employees who have or could have an impacton the operational aspects of a recipient? Is it too broad? Should otherspecific jobs be included such as other maintenance personnel? Employee Assistance Programs UMTA has determined that properly managed Employee Assistance Programs(EAP's) benefit both management and employees and can be a positive factorin controlling drug use. UMTA recognizes that individually established EAP's may be beyond the fiscalresources of some recipients. However, the recipient of Federal financialtransit assistance has a responsibility to employees and the public toprovide a drug-free environment to the maximum extent practical. As such,in certain circumstances, under the proposed rule, recipients would provideEAP services or make such services available through one of the followingmeans: company-operated EAP; contractor or consortium arrangement; or arrangementswith local community service organizations for voluntary referrals or employer-directedreferrals. Other alternatives to the above must be approved by UMTA andwould have to provide an equivalent level of EAP service to employees.The proposed rule would require that an EAP provide education, trainingfor employees and supervisory personnel, and, under three of four proposedoptions, an opportunity for rehabilitation. An EAP may include the following components: (a) Employee policy and procedures on drug use based on a grantee's uniqueneeds, organizational structure, and goals and resources; (b) Employee communications that include ongoing printed educational materialsdirected at both drivers and family members; (c) Service delivery system which may include: (1) Drug screening and confirmation testing and (2) Treatment (rehabilitation) and/or referral to more appropriate or specializedprofessional facility (usually all testing is on a contract basis); (d) Training of supervisors; and (e) Evaluation of the effectiveness of the EAP. UMTA has determined that properly managed EAPs benefit both the granteeand employee. We propose to require that all grantees develop EAPs fortheir employees. Each EAP would be required to have an educational componentwhich would minimally have display and distribution of informational material;display and distribution of the community-service hot-line telephone numberfor driver assistance (if one is available); and display and distributionof the grantee policy regarding drug use by drivers. Additionally, eachEAP of a grantee would be required to provide annual training for employeesand supervisory personnel. The training would minimally require the followingelements: The effects and consequences of drug use on personal health,safety, and work environment; the manifestations and behavioral causesthat may indicate drug use and abuse; and documentation of training givento employees and supervisory personnel. EAP training programs for employeesand supervisory personnel would consist of at least 60 minutes for eachdriver and supervisor the first year. Is 60 minutes a sufficient time forthis training? Finally, each EAP, under three of the four options presented,would provide an opportunity for rehabilitation. How should small granteesestablish and manage EAPs? Employers would be required to appoint or designate a Medical Review Officer(MRO). The MRO would perform several functions, including review of theresults of the employer's drug testing program; interpretation of eachconfirmed positive test result; and evaluation of an individual in conjunctionwith an EAP rehabilitation program. UMTA also seeks comments on the MRO'sappropriate role in determining when an individual might be returned toduty. The proposed rule (by reference to the HHS Guidelines) requires thatan MRO be a licensed doctor of medicine or osteopathy. The MRO could bea currently employed company physician or could be a private physicianwho performs MRO service for the employer on a contractual basis. Commentsare requested on the need for an MRO and if the MRO need be a licensedphysician or could be another type of medical professional. An employee must successfully complete a rehabilitation program beforebeing returned to his or her previous duties. UMTA is not proposing torequire employers to pay the cost of rehabilitation. At this time, theproposed rule does not impose any limits on the amount of time that anemployee may use to complete a rehabilitation program. However, UMTA recognizesthat requiring an employer to hold a position open or adjust operationsfor an indefinite period, while an employee is enrolled in a rehabilitation,may result in inconvenience and hardship for some employers, especiallysmaller companies. Therefore, UMTA solicits comments on an equitable andappropriate amount of time for an employee to complete a rehabilitationprogram to be specified in the rule, and whether the amount of time shouldbe different for smaller companies. UMTA is particularly interested intime frames that have been shown to be appropriate for other documentedrehabilitation programs, taking into account how long it may take for anemployee to be admitted to a rehabilitation program. Commenters also should address whether employees involved in EAP programscould be employed in nonsensitive safety positions during the rehabilitationprocess. The proposed rule does not require the employer to offer thesesame opportunities to a repeat offender, to persons not currently employedby the employer who fail a pre-employment test, or persons who have beenfound to use drugs on the job. UMTA is considering four different options concerning the circumstancesunder which employees would be given an opportunity to seek rehabilitation.Under the first option, an employee who comes forward voluntarily or testspositive for drugs for the first time would be eligible for rehabilitationrather than be discharged. Non-employees given a pre-employment drug testneed not be given an opportunity for rehabilitation. Once rehabilitated,the employee would be reinstated into his or her prior position. The secondoption would provide rehabilitation rights to an employee who comes forwardvoluntarily or who is identified as a drug user during a random test; butwould not require that the same opportunity be afforded to an employeeidentified as a drug user in a post-accident or reasonable cause test.Under this option, a rehabilitated employee would be reinstated into hisor her prior position, but an employee who is not afforded the right torehabilitation could be discharged. In the third option, only an employeewho comes forward voluntarily could claim rehabilitation rights, and anyonetesting positive for drugs (regardless of the circumstances, e.g., random,post-accident, reasonable cause) could be fired immediately. Under allthree proposed options, recipients would be free to offer more rehabilitationoptions than proposed. The proposed options only establish minimum rehabilitationrequirements for EAP's. Thus for example, a recipient could voluntarilyoffer two chances at rehabilitation rather than one. The fourth option would require the employer to determine, as part of itsanti-drug program, what rehabilitation opportunities to provide. This isessentially a ``local option'' approach. The employer could choose anyof the three other options as its approach or some variation of them. Itcould choose not to provide an opportunity for rehabilitation in any circumstance,in which case an employee who was identified as a drug user could be fired.In any case, however, the employee could not return to a sensitive safetyposition unless he or she met the conditions established in the option4 version of andSection; 653.52. Each of these approaches has its own merits. For example, the broad rehabilitationprogram anticipated by the first alternative is likely to maximize boththe costs and the benefits to society, by ensuring that more drug userswill get the help they need. If users are simply fired, they will oftenlose access to, and perhaps incentive to use rehabilitation services, andthey may continue to be drug users. However, it could be argued that employeeswho are found to be drug users through post-accident or reasonable causetests are less deserving of an opportunity for rehabilitation, and thesecond alternative would therefore exclude them. The third alternativeis likely to be the lowest in direct costs, because rehabilitation wouldbe required only for employees who seek it voluntarily, but for the samereason, however, this alternative might produce less in societal benefits.Commenters should address whether, and to what extent the third alternativewould encourage drug users to identify themselves before they are tested,in contrast to the first and second alternatives, which appear to provideless incentives for drug users to identify themselves before they are discoveredthrough the testing process. The fourth option could permit employees torid their work forces of drug users more quickly and at a lower cost (ifrehabilitation opportunities were not provided). It would also permit greaterflexibility at the local level. The benefits of rehabilitation might belost, however. Commenters should address whether this alternative wouldbe effective for the transit industry. How would this alternative affectthe deterrence value of the proposal? What impact would it have on thecosts and benefits? Would not requiring rehabilitation foster other approachesto combating drug usage? UMTA specifically invites comment on which of these or other alternativesoffer the greatest benefits at the lowest costs. Under any of these options, if the individual was successfully rehabilitated,the program would require that he or she be offered the opportunity toreturn to his or her former position. The NPRM does not specify who makesthe decision concerning whether the individual has been successfully rehabilitated,however. UMTA seeks comments on whether the final rule should so specify.If the final rule does specify who makes this decision, who should thedecision-maker be? Should it be the medical review officer, the head ofthe EAP, the head of the drug rehabilitation program in which the employeeparticipated, an independent physician, or some combination of these persons?Are there other individuals that should be participated or required tomake the decision?UMTA also seeks comments on whether the rule should contain standards formaking this determination. If so, what should they be? Should the employer,UMTA, or both have a procedure through which the employee can contest adetermination that he or she had not been rehabilitated?Post-rehabilitation TestingOnce an employee has undergone rehabilitation, there may be a need to conducttests to ensure continued disassociation from drugs. At the time of theadoption of a final rule in this proceeding, we intend to provide proceduresfor the conduct of such tests. We invite public comment on what the finalrule should contain.For example, should there be a uniform testing period after rehabilitation,or should this be determined on a case-by-case basis? Who should make sucha determination: the medical review officer (whose role is noted in theHHS Guidelines), the EAP counselor, or both together? Should the employeebe involved? How could employee involvement be accomplished? If we adopta uniform post-rehabilitation period, how long should it be? Is six monthsreasonable? Would longer periods constitute an unacceptable burden on employeesand on the employer? Others might argue that a longer follow-up period,such as one year, is called for. Should the length of the follow-up perioddepend on the kind of drug that was detected? Should it depend on the severityof the individual's drug problem, as indicated by the kind of treatmentthat was found to be necessary? For example, should someone undergoinginpatient rehabilitation be subject to post-rehabilitation testing fora longer time than someone who needs only abatement counseling?During the post-rehabilitation period, should we prescribe the minimumand/or maximum number of tests to be administered? We would want to ensurethat any necessary tests would be given frequently enough to ensure thatthe employee is free of drugs. At the same time, however, we do not wantdrug testing to become an instrument of harassment of the employee or anundue burden on the employer. Here again is the issue of whether the numberof tests given should vary with the kind of drug used and the severityof the employee's problem.One alternative, on which we also invite comments, is a specified post-rehabilitationtesting period that would apply only if the employee, the EAP counselor,and perhaps the employer failed to agree on an individualized program.Such a fall-back system could provide, for example, for up to four additionaltests over the 12 months following rehabilitation.Temporary Employees  Although the rehabilitation for drug users is a cornerstone of this program,we believe that there may be some employees in the industry whose normalperiod of employment is too short to make it practical to require rehabilitationand reemployment. For example, even if a short-term hire seeks rehabilitation,the end of the scheduled employment term might come before the completionof a rehabilitation program. Therefore, we are considering not requiringemployers to offer an opportunity for rehabilitation to temporary employeeswho are hired for a period of less than 90 days. That is, if such employeesare found to be drug users, it would be permissible to dismiss these personsimmediately.  However, we recognize that some employees hired on a ``temporary'' basisare actually regularly reemployed. Some of these employees are recurringseasonal hires, others are continually reemployed at the end of each specifiedterm. These persons are regular members of the industry, and thus, shouldnot be excluded from the opportunity for rehabilitation and reemployment.Under the proposal, an employee would not be considered temporary for thepurposes of rehabilitation, if he or she is eligible for reemployment bythe same employer within 90 days following the end of the employment term.We specifically request comments on (1) the merits of excluding temporaryemployees from the opportunity for rehabilitation, and (2) the definitionof temporary employees. Commenters also should address how the rules shouldbe applied to striking employees or employees scheduled for layoffs. Definitionsof these terms also should be addressed.  Reporting Requirements  Semi-annual and annual reports of the results under each program wouldbe required under the proposed rule. The report would contain demographicdata of drug abuse by occupational category, drugs detected, and geographiclocations.  Those semi-annual and annual progress reports would be sent to UMTA. UMTAis proposing that the reports should provide the following summary informationfor each type of testing performed: Occupational group of tested employees,the specific drugs detected and the disposition of employees (e.g., termination,rehabilitation, resignation, and other categories as applicable, such asleave without pay). Confidentiality must be afforded to all informationregarding drug abuse by employees. This data would be used by UMTA onlyto summarize trends and determine if additional actions or changes maybe required to combat drug use and abuse in aviation. We invite commentson the frequency and content of reports to be filed.  Access to Employee Drug Use Information  The proposed rule would regulate access to information about an employee'sdrug testing history under the anti-drug program by future employers, includingfuture employers in other transportation modes. UMTA specifically requestspublic comment on what procedures, if any, should be included in the ruleto safeguard the privacy of persons tested under the anti-drug program.As noted above, we are considering a variety of options with respect topre-employment drug tests, including mandatory destruction of the documentsfor employees not hired. The results of drug tests performed for otherreasons, however, also raise important privacy questions. Therefore, wespecifically invite comments about whether there are circumstances underwhich we should permit the disclosure of drug test data to persons otherthan the employer and the employee (such as future employers). If, in thefinal rule, we were to allow such disclosure, there would appear to bea number of options. First, the data could be released only at the specificrequest of the future employer, at either the discretion of the employerconducting the test, or only at the request of the employee. Under anotheroption, a subsequent employer could require that an applicant either discloseprior drug test results or give the employer permission to obtain priordrug test results as a condition of employment. A final option under considerationby UMTA is authorizing the release of test results to future employersonly in specified circumstances. For example, confirmed positive test resultswould be released to subsequent employers where an employee had been dischargedfor a refusal to participate in a rehabilitation program or an employeehad failed a drug tests after completing rehabilitation. Interested personsalso should comment on whether the proposed rules should treat the privacyissues related to pre-employment test differently from random or reasonablecause tests.  The potential release of data highlights the importance of an employee'sright to contest the test results. A urine sample that had been subjectto tampering could unjustly end an employee's career. An employee shouldhave an opportunity to challenge the integrity of the testing process,for example, by contesting whether the positive test result arose froma tampering incident or other error in the testing process. UMTA, therefore,requests comments on what procedures should be adopted. Commenters alsoshould address whether the types of procedures afforded an employee shouldvary depending upon the consequences of a positive test and whether theburden of proof on the validity of test results should be borne by theemployee or the employer.In addition to future employers, other individuals may want access to theresults of drug tests conducted under the proposed rules. UMTA could prohibitaccess to test results by the general public, including the news media.Moreover, other government agencies may want the data for statistical,regulatory, or law enforcement purposes. UMTA requests comments on whetherthe rule can and should prohibit access to the results of the anti-drugprogram to individuals other than the employer and the employee.A related issue involves whether UMTA should distinguish between generalstatistical data (the total number of positive tests at a company in amonth or a year) and particularized data (name-specific data). Small operatorswho employ few individuals will have difficulty concealing the identityof individuals tested under the proposed anti-drug program. Since smalloperators will have few individuals to test in any given time period, evenseemingly neutral statistical data would result in identification of anindividual employee who was dismissed as a result of a confirmed positivetest result. This potential problem may be exacerbated if UMTA requiresthat only a small percentage of employees be tested each year.HHS GuidelinesOn April 11, 1988, the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) publishedMandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs. Theseinclude guidelines for drug testing procedures and standards for certifyingdrug testing laboratories (53 FR 11970). As drafted, the guidelines applyto drug testing programs conducted by Federal agencies themselves. ThisNPRM would direct regulated parties to conduct their drug-testing programsaccording to these guidelines as well.The HHS guidelines include proposed solutions to concerns such as the integrityof the sample collection process, maintaining a proper chain of custody,and ensuring that laboratories that do drug testing are qualified to doso.The HHS guidelines would establish what illegal drugs are to be testedfor (e.g., marijuana, cocaine, amphetamines, PCP, and opiates) and thelevels of drug metabolites in a sample that would result in a positivetest being reported. The guidelines specify the types of tests that wouldbe required for initial screening tests (an immunoassay test) and confirmatorytests (a gas chromatography/mass spectrometry test).The guidelines also specify collection procedures. These include the useof toilet bluing agents, temperature monitoring, and other steps to ensurethe integrity of the sample without requiring observation of the individualwhile he or she is providing the sample. The sample collection proceduresalso include filling out a chain-of-custody form to accompany the sampleas it goes to the laboratory.The guidelines for laboratory processing of samples cover both technicaland procedural steps designed to ensure that a proper chain of custodyis maintained and that the test is conducted accurately. Intralaboratorychain-of-custody forms would be used; only authorized personnel would haveaccess to the sample. Records concerning the calibration of testing instrumentswould be maintained. Laboratories would report test results to the employerin a timely manner, and statistics on the tests would be retained by thelaboratory for 2 years.In addition to setting forth qualifications for key laboratory personneland quality control procedures for the laboratories, the guidelines includestandards and procedures through which HHS certifies laboratories. Regulatedparties would be required to use only those laboratories which HHS hascertified pursuant to these standards.<ITAG tagnum="84">E. Hearings and Request for Written Comment</ITAG>UMTA intends to hold hearings on today's proposed rulemaking in Washington,DC, New York City, Chicago, and Los Angeles. The exact times and locationsof these hearings are not yet available. Once the exact times and locationsof these hearings are confirmed, UMTA will publish a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Commenters wishing acknowledgment of their writtencomments should include a self-addressed, stamped postcard with their comments.The Docket Clerk will stamp the card with the date and time the commentsare received and return the card to the commenter.<ITAG tagnum="84">F. Regulatory Impacts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">1. Executive Order 12291</ITAG>This action has been reviewed under Executive Order 12291, and UMTA hasdetermined this is not a major rule. If promulgated, this rule will notresult in an annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more.<ITAG tagnum="84">2. Regulatory Evaluation</ITAG>The proposed regulation would be a ``significant'' rule, as defined bythe Department's Policies and Procedures on Improving Governmental Regulations,because it involves important departmental policy and will generate substantialpublic interest. UMTA has prepared a Regulatory Evaluation in support ofthis rulemaking. The Regulatory Evaluation is on file as part of the docketto this rulemaking.Commenters should be aware that other operating administrations withinthe Department of Transportation also are proposing drug testing programs.Elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4> are NPRMs issued by the Coast Guard andamp; Researchandamp; Special Program Administration.In addition, the Federal Aviation Administration published an NPRM in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> on March 14, 1988 (53 FR 8368); the Federal RailroadAdministration's NPRM was published on May 10, 1988 (53 FR 16640); andthe Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) published its NPRM on June 14,1988 (53 FR 22268).Each of these rulemakings addresses the costs and benefits of the proposaland are generally consistent with one another. In some instances, however,and generally as a result of differences in the industries affected, theassumptions differ from those discussed in this proposed rulemaking. Obviously,changes in assumptions could affect the costs and benefits, because ofthe nature of some industries, costs for similar elements also may varyor could vary enough to warrant sensitivity analyses. Other changes inassumptions, such as test costs or rehabilitation costs, also can havean affect on the analysis. Commenters may find it helpful to review thenotices of proposed rulemakings or the economic analyses prepared by theother operating administrations. Comparisons may aid commenters in reviewingdata on this proposal and in formulating comments. In reviewing the economicanalysis and the basic assumptions made, commenters should address specificareas where they agree or disagree with the assumptions and the basis forthe comment. Commenters are directed to the other rulemakings and theirassumptions as a source of information in submitting comments. A copy ofeach of the documents has been placed in the docket.<ITAG tagnum="84">3. Executive Order 12612_Federalism Assessment</ITAG>UMTA has reviewed this proposed rule under Executive Order 12612, concerningFederalism. UMTA has determined that the proposal has sufficient Federalismimplications to warrant the preparation of this Federalism assessment.The Federalism impacts of this rulemaking result from its proposal fornew, uniform UMTA requirements that federally-assisted mass transportationproviders create and implement the drug programs described in this notice.Historically, transportation safety in the mass transit industry has notbeen the subject of specific UMTA regulatory requirements. Unlike otherDOT organizations (e.g., FAA, FHWA, Coast Guard, FRA), UMTA has never directlylicensed or regulated industry employees for safety. These matters havebeen handled locally by transit authorities.Congress has shown increasing concern about UMTA's role in transit safety,for example in the enactment of section 22 of the UMT Act. More importantly,however, the necessity of promoting safe transportation through the useof vigorous anti-drug programs designed to ensure a drug-free mass transitworkplace is national in scope and overriding in importance. This safetyimperative is the primary basis for UMTA's decision to propose a new Federalrequirement which goes beyond the traditional relationship between UMTA,transit grantees, and their employees. The basis for imposing these requirementsis the Federal financial assistance provided to the recipients by UMTA.It is also important that UMTA ensure the maximum effectiveness of itsfinancial assistance; i.e., it must ensure that the funds are used in asafe, drug-free environment. From a national perspective, safety is importantin its own right but also to ensure Federal funds are not wanted becauseof drug-related accidents or other misuses.In considering the Federalism impacts of this proposal, UMTA has focusedon several key provisions of Executive Order 12612.andbullet; <T3>Necessity for action. </T3>As noted above, there is an overriding safetynecessity to ensure a drug-free transportation workplace. Passengers onbus, rail, and other mass transportation systems must be ensured that vehicleoperators and others whose actions are important to passenger safety donot use illegal drugs. In the absence of an UMTA requirement for drug programs,which will identify drug users, deter drug use, and may provide opportunitiesfor rehabilitation, this assurance cannot be made.andbullet; <T3>Consultation with State and local governments.</T3> Unlike other DOTorganizations with respect to drug rules, UMTA's regulated parties areprimarily State and local government agencies (e.g., State departmentsof transportation, local transit authorities). This is the peculiarityof the UMTA drug rule which creates a larger Federalism impact than thatcreated by drug rules in other modes. Consequently, the views of affectedState and local agencies are particularly crucial to UMTA's considerationof the issues raised in this NPRM. On any significant rulemaking affectingits grantees, UMTA receives numerous and thorough comments from State andlocal agencies. UMTA will take its normal extra steps, beyond <T4>Federal Register</T4> publication, to ensure that these State and localgovernments are made aware of this proposed rule. Between the written commentsand the four public hearings UMTA is planning to hold, UMTA expects tolearn, in detail, the concerns of State and local governments about thisproposal. These comments will be taken into account as UMTA makes decisionsconcerning the final rule on this subject.andbullet; <T3>National scope of the problem. </T3>As noted elsewhere, the countryhas a nationwide, pervasive drug problem. There is no community in thecountry that is not affected, actually or potentially, by this problem.Mass transit users in every community need the same assurance that theirsafety will not be compromised by drug use by sensitive safety transitemployees. They also need assurance that their tax dollar used in Federalassistance are not wasted because of drug-related accidents.andbullet; <T3>Need for uniform, national standards. </T3>Only with uniform minimumnational standards in this area can the safety concerns of passengers andthe privacy and reliability concerns of employees be resolved in a waythat addresses the national drug problem we face. State and local agenciesare free to tailor the basic program requirements to meet their needs.Federal intrusion into local implementation decisions will be minimizedthrough the use of self-certification by grantees of their compliance withUMTA requirements.andbullet; <T3>Authority. </T3>The statutory authority for this proposal is discussedelsewhere in this preamble. As a statutory and constitutional matter, theauthority of Federal agencies to impose reasonable and necessary conditionson the receipt of Federal financial assistance is well established.andbullet; <T3>Preemption. </T3>The NPRM does not, as such, preempt State or locallaws. However, there may be a few instances in which a State or local agencycould face a conflict between compliance with the proposed regulation andState and local requirements. For example, the NPRM would require randomtesting. Some State or local laws may prohibit or limit random testing.In this situation, the UMTA rule would not preempt the application of theState or local law; if compliance with the State or local law preventedthe grantee from complying with the UMTA rule, however, the grantee's UMTAfunding could be jeopardized. It is our understanding that most granteesoperate under statutes that permit them to take all necessary actions tocomply with Federal grant conditions. Such laws, in most cases, could resolvethe potential conflict outlined above. UMTA seeks comments on whether conflictsof this sort are likely to arise and, if so, what steps should be takento avoid or resolve them.Given these considerations, UMTA has determined that, while the proposedrule will have Federalism impacts, the justifications for and proposedmethods of dealing with the impacts are such that proposing the rule isconsistent with the Administration's Federalism policy. UMTA seeks commentson any additional alternatives that would achieve the proposal's objectiveswhile reducing Federalism impacts or that would mitigate these impacts.<ITAG tagnum="84">4. Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG>In accordance with 5 U.S.C. 605(b), as added by the Regulatory FlexibilityAct, Pub. L. 96-354, UMTA certifies that this proposed rule, if promulgated,will not have a significant economic impact on a substantial number ofsmall entities within the meaning of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">5. Environmental Impacts</ITAG>This proposed regulation would not adversely affect the environment.<ITAG tagnum="84">6. Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>The collection of information requirements contained in this proposed ruleare subject to the Paperwork Reduction Act, Pub. L. 96-511, 44 U.S.C. Chapter35. These requirements are being submitted to the Office of Managementand Budget for review. Comments on the proposed certification requirementmust be sent to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Officeof Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503, Attention: Desk Officerfor Department of Transportation. UMTA requests that the commenter alsotransmit an information copy of any such comments to UMTA Docket No. 88-F.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 49 CFR Part 653</ITAG>Drug testing, Grant programs_transportation, Mass transportation.<ITAG tagnum="84">G. NEW 49 CFR PART 653</ITAG>Accordingly, for the reasons described in the preamble, 49 CFR ChapterVI would be amended by adding new Part 653 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 653_CONTROL OF DRUG USE IN FEDERALLY FUNDED MASS TRANSPORTATIONOPERATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.1 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.2 Scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.4 Establishment of recipient anti-drug program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.5 Recipient's comprehensive anti-drug program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.6 Use of prescribed drugs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Post Accident Toxicological Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.10 Testing requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.11 Testing procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.12 Guidelines for drug testing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.13 Fatal accident drug test report.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.14 Driver fatalities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Reasonable Cause Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.20 Testing requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.21 Testing procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Pre-Employment Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.30 Testing requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.31 Testing procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Random Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.40 Testing requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.41 Testing procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Employee Assistance Programs and Rehabilitation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.50 Employee assistance program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.51 Opportunity for rehabilitation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.52 Job security.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.53 EAP education program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">653.54 EAP training program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1601, 1602, 1607, and 1618, and 23 U.S.C.103(e)(4).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>(a) This part requires a recipient of Federal transit funds to establisha program to detect and deter the use of controlled substances.(b) This part does not restrict a recipient from adopting and enforcingadditional or more stringent requirements consistent with this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope.</ITAG>(a) This part applies to a recipient of Federal financial assistance undersections 3, 9, or 18 of the Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964, as amended,or 23 U.S.C. 103(e)(4).(b) The program required by this part applies to employees of the recipientin sensitive-safety positions, including vehicle operators, controllers,and mechanics.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part_``Administrator'' means the Administrator of the Urban Mass TransportationAdministration or his or her designee.``Fatal accident'' means an accident involving a vehicle of the recipientwhich leads to the death of a human being within 24 hours after the accident.``HHS Drug Testing Guidelines'' means the Scientific and Technical Guidelinesfor Drug Testing Programs issued by the Alcohol, Drug Abuse, and MentalHealth Administration of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.These guidelines are available for review at UMTA headquarters and eachUMTA regional office.``Prohibited drug'' means a substance specified in Schedule I or ScheduleII of the Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 801.812, unless the drugis being used as authorized by, and in accordance with a legal prescriptionor exemption under Federal, State, or local law.``Random selection process'' means that tests are unannounced; that everyemployee in a sensitive-safety position of a given recipient has an equalchance of selection; and the total number of random tests conducted annuallyshall equal or exceed a specified (up to 125) percent of the total numberof sensitive safety employees of a recipient.``Reasonable cause'' means the recipient reasonably believes that the appearanceand/or conduct of the employee on duty are indicative of being under theinfluence of or impaired by a controlled substance based upon specifiedobservations. The questioned conduct must be witnessed and documented byat least two employees, one of whom is in a supervisory capacity.``Recipient'' means a direct recipient of Federal financial assistanceunder sections 3, 9 or 18 of the UMT Act, or 23 U.S.C. 103(e)(4).``Sensitive safety position'' means any position of a recipient that involvesoperation of passenger-carrying equipment, including any directly relatedsupport activities that control or affect the operation of such equipment.``UMTA'' means the Urban Mass Transportation Administration.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Establishment of recipient anti-drug program.</ITAG>(a) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this subpart, eachrecipient shall certify to UMTA that it has established and implementeda comprehensive anti-drug program meeting the requirements of this part.(b) Failure to make the certification required under paragraph (a) shallrender the recipient ineligible to receive Federal financial assistanceunder sections 3, 9 or 18 of the Urban Mass Transportation Assistance Actof 1964, as amended.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Recipient's comprehensive anti-drug program.</ITAG>(a) Each recipient's comprehensive anti-drug program shall provide that_(1) No employee of the recipient shall perform sensitive safety functionsif the employee uses any controlled substances, except as provided in andSection;653.6 of this subpart;(2) No employee shall perform sensitive safety functions if the employeetests positive for the presence of controlled substances, except as providedin andSection; 653.6 of this subpart;(3) All employees are subject to post-accident, reasonable cause and randomtesting for drugs under Subparts B, C, and E of this part;(4) All prospective employees are subject to pre-employment testing fordrugs under Subpart D of this part;(5) Certain employees who use controlled substances are eligible to participatein an employee assistance program under Subpart F of this part; and(6) An employee who refuses to be tested as prescribed under this partshall not perform sensitive safety functions until the individual testsnegative for the use of controlled substances.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of prescribed drugs.</ITAG>(a) A comprehensive anti-drug program shall provide that any employee ofa recipient who tests positive for the use of a controlled substance shallhave available as an affirmative defense, to be proven by the employeethrough clear and convincing evidence, that his or her use of the controlledsubstance (except for methadone) was as prescribed by a licensed medicalpractitioner who has considered the employee's medical history and hasdetermined such use to be consistent with the employee's assigned dutiesand that the level was at the prescribed dosage.(b) This section does not restrict a recipient from requiring an employeeto notify the recipient of therapeutic drug use.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Post-Accident Toxicological Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing requirements.</ITAG>(a) A recipient's drug program shall ensure that post-accident toxicologicaltests are conducted on an employee in a sensitive-safety position who isinvolved in a fatal accident.(b) Such an employee shall submit to controlled substance testing followinga fatal accident.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing procedures.</ITAG>(a) A recipient's drug program shall require an employee of the recipientin a sensitive-safety position to be tested for controlled substance useif the employee is involved in a fatal accident. The sample should be collectedas soon as possible, but no later than 12 hours after the fatality.(b)(1) Such an employee of the recipient shall report or be transportedto a collection site and give a urine sample as soon as possible, but notlater than 12 hours following a fatality. If a hazard to occupants of thevehicle would be increased by compliance with this subpart, the employeeof the recipient may move the vehicle to the nearest safe place to reduceor eliminate the hazard.(2) If the employee is incapacitated or unconscious, the recipient shallrequest the treating medical facility to obtain a body fluid sample asdetermined appropriate by a medical practitioner.(c) A recipient shall ensure that a legible copy of instructions for collection,labeling, packaging, and mailing of body fluid samples shall be maintainedon each recipient vehicle. The instructions for collection, labeling, andpackaging shall conform with the HHS guidelines. Mailing instructions shallinclude the name, mailing address, and telephone number of the test laboratoryused by the recipient.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Guidelines for drug testing.</ITAG>The recipient shall ensure that its drug testing program conforms withthe HHS Drug Testing Guidelines.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fatal accident drug test report.</ITAG>(a) Within 24 hours of receipt of a drug test result, a recipient shallprepare a report on the results.(b) Refusals. If a recipient cannot report a drug test result because anemployee refuses to give a sample or for other reasons, the recipient'sreport shall so provide.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.14</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Driver fatalities.</ITAG>(a) A recipient shall ensure that controlled substance testing is conductedon a deceased employee involved in an accident in accordance with the proceduresof this subpart.(b) If the employee is deceased, the recipient shall request the responsiblelocal authority (e.g., a coroner or medical examiner) to obtain a bodyfluid or tissue sample as appropriate.(c)(1) If urine is obtained, the responsible local authority should place60 milliliters (ml) of urine in a standard 80 ml screw-top container.(2) If blood is obtained, the responsible local authority should place20 milliliters of blood in red-top glass tubes.(3) If tissue is obtained, the responsible local authority should place50 to 100 grams of liver, kidney, spleen, lung or muscle tissue, as available,or gastric content, up to 100 milliliters, as available, in a red-top glasstube.(d) Sample handling, packaging, and mailing should follow the instructionsprescribed in andSection; 653.11(c) of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Reasonable Cause Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing requirements.</ITAG>A recipient's drug program shall require an employee of the recipient ina sensitive-safety position to be tested upon reasonable cause for theuse of controlled substances under the conditions specified in this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing procedures.</ITAG>(a) The recipient shall ensure that the employee of the recipient in asensitive-safety position is transported immediately to a collection sitefor the collection of a urine sample.(b) The recipient's program shall ensure that its drug-testing programconforms with the HHS Drug Testing Guidelines.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Pre-Employment Testing</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.30 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing requirements.</ITAG>(a) A recipient's drug program shall require an applicant for employmentfor a sensitive-safety position to be tested as a condition to employmentfor the use of controlled subtances as a condition of employment. (b) Prior to collection of a urine sample an applicant for employment fora sensitive-safety position shall be notified that the sample will be testedfor the presence of controlled substances.(c) The applicant will be notified if the test is positive and be affordedan opportunity to explain the presence of a controlled substance.(d) If the applicant is not hired, no record of the test results shallbe maintained by the recipient.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.31 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing procedures.</ITAG>(a) The sample shall consist of a urine specimen.(b) A recipient shall ensure its drug-testing program conforms with theHHS Drug Testing Guidelines.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Random Testing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing requirements. </ITAG>A recipient's drug program shall provide for a random selection processto select and require an employee of the recipient in a sensitive-safetyposition to be tested for the use of controlled substances.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.41 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing procedures.</ITAG>(a) The sample shall consist of a urine specimen.(b) A recipient shall ensure its drug-testing program conforms with theHHS Drug Testing Guidelines.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Employee Assistance Programs and Rehabilitation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 648.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Employee Assistance Program.</ITAG>The employer shall provide an employee assistance program (EAP) for employees.The employer may establish the EAP as a part of its internal personnelservices or the employer may enter into a contract with an entity thatwill provide EAP services to employees. Each EAP must include educationand training on drug use for employees and the employer's supervisory personneland [shall] [may] include an opportunity for rehabilitation as providedin this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Opportunity for rehabilitation [Option andplusmin;1].</ITAG>Each employer shall provide one rehabilitation opportunity for the followingemployees:(a) Each employee who voluntarily enrolls in an EAP.(b) Each employee who is identified as a drug user through random, periodic,or post-accident testing, or testing based on reasonable cause.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.52 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Job security [Option andplusmin;1].</ITAG>(a) Each employer shall retain or rehire an employee who_(1) Has successfully completed his or her first rehabilitation programafter voluntary enrollment or notification to the employee that he or shefailed a drug test; (2) Has not failed a drug test required by the employer's drug testingplan for employees who have completed rehabilitation; and(3) Has received a recommendation for return to duty as a result of thatrehabilitation program.(b) Employees who are identified as drug users on the job are not requiredto be afforded an opportunity for rehabilitation or to be retained or rehired.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Opportunity for rehabilitation [Option andplusmin;2].</ITAG>Each employer shall provide on rehabilitation opportinity for the followingemployees:(a) Each employee who voluntarily enrolls in an EAP.(b) Each employee who is identified as a drug user through random or periodictesting.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.52 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Job security [Option andplusmin;2].</ITAG>(a) Each employer shall retain or rehire an employee who_(1) Has successfully completed his or her first rehabilitation programafter voluntary enrollment or notification to the employee that he or shehas failed a random or periodic drug test; (2) Has not failed a drug test required by the employer's drug testingplan for employees who have completed rehabilitation; and (3) Has received a recommendation for return to duty as a result of therehabilitation program.(b) Employees who are identified as drug users on the job or as a resultof testing based on reasonable cause or post-accident testing requiredby this appendix are not required to be afforded an opportunity for rehabilitationor to be retained or rehired. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Opportunity for rehabilitation [Option andplusmin;3]. </ITAG>Each employer shall provide one rehabilitation opportunity for each employeewho voluntarily enrolls in an EAP. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.52 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Job security [Option andplusmin;3]. </ITAG>(a) Each employer shall retain or rehire an employee who_ (1) Has successfully completed his or her first rehabilitation programafter voluntary enrollment; (2) Has not failed a drug test required by the employer's drug testingplan for employees who have completed rehabilitation; and (3) Has received a recommendation for return to duty as a result of thatrehabilitation program. (b) Employees who are identified as drug users on the job or as a resultof testing required by this appendix are not required to be afforded anopportunity for rehabilitation or to be retained or rehired. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Opportunity for rehabilitation [Option andplusmin;4]. </ITAG>Each employer shall determine, as part of its anti-drug program, whetherto provide one rehabilitation opportunity for each employee who is identifiedas a drug user by one or more types of testing or who voluntarily enrollsin the EAP. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.52 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Job security [Option andplusmin;4]. </ITAG>(a) An employer may not retain or rehire for a sensitive safety positionan employee who has been identified as a drug user through a drug testor through voluntary enrollment in an EAP unless the employee_ (a) Has successfully completed his or her first rehabilitation opportunityafter voluntary enrollment or notification to the employee that he or shehas failed a particular type of drug test, if the employer's anti-drugprogram provides for a rehabilitation opportunity in that circumstance;(2) Has not failed a drug test required by the employer's drug testingplan for employers who have completed rehabilitation; and (3) Has received a recommendation for return to duty as a result of thatrehabilitation program. (b) Employees who are identified as drug users on the job are not requiredto be afforded an opportunity for rehabilitation or to be retained or rehired.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.53 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EAP education program. </ITAG>Each EAP must include an education program with the following elements:(a) Display and distribution of informational material; (b) Display and distribution of a community service hot-line telephonenumber for employee assistance; and (c) Display and distribution of the employer's policy regarding drug usein the workplace. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 653.54 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EAP training program. </ITAG>Each EAP must include a training program to be conducted annually for employeesand employer's supervisory personnel. During the first year of the program,such training must be conducted for all such personnel. The training programmust include at least the following elements: the effects and consequencesof drug use on personal health, safety, and work environment; the manifestationsand behavioral cues that may indicate drug use and abuse; and documentationof training given to employees and employer's supervisory personnel. EAPtraining programs for employees and supervisory personnel must consistof at least 60 minutes for each employee and supervisor each year.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: June 30, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Alfred A. DelliBovi, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-15094 Filed 7-7-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-57-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>